Hawaii statutes.
§657-14 Disability to exist at accrual of
action. No person shall avail oneself of any disability enumerated in this
part, unless the disability existed at the time the right of action accrued.
[CC 1859, §1046; RL 1925, §2649; RL 1935, §3920; RL 1945, §10431; RL 1955,
§241-13; HRS §657-14; am L 1972, c 105, §1(g); gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Cited: 29 H. 579, 586.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next